test/src/morphology/N-siilma_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - sīlma: # Noun 34 'eng /est silm/fin' - full paradigm
     sīlma+N+Sg+Nom: sīlma
     sīlma+N+Sg+Gen: sīlma
     sīlma+N+Sg+Par: silmõ
     sīlma+N+Sg+Dat: sīlman
     sīlma+N+Sg+Ins: sīlmaks
     sīlma+N+Sg+Ill: silmõ
     sīlma+N+Sg+Ela: sīlmast
     sīlma+N+Pl+Nom: sīlmad
     sīlma+N+Pl+Gen: sīlmad
     sīlma+N+Pl+Par: siļmi
     sīlma+N+Pl+Dat: sīlmadõn
     sīlma+N+Pl+Ins: sīlmadõks
     sīlma+N+Pl+Ill: [siļmži, sīlmiž]
     sīlma+N+Pl+Ela: [siļmšti, sīlmist]
